California statutes. Unemployment Insurance Code
(g) Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude the department from requesting additional medical evidence to supplement the first or any continued claim if the additional evidence can be procured without additional cost to the claimant. The department may require that the additional evidence include any or all of the following:

(1) Identification of diagnoses.

(2) Identification of symptoms.

(3) A statement setting forth the facts of the claimant’s disability. The statement shall be completed by any of the following individuals:

(A) The physician or
 practitioner treating the claimant.

(B) The registrar, authorized medical officer, or other duly authorized official of the hospital or health facility treating the claimant.

(C) An examining physician or other representative of the department.

(h) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2014.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 497, Sec. 5.   (SB 667)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2708.1.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), where an individual is entitled to receive unemployment compensation disability benefits reduced by the amount of temporary workers’ compensation received for any day under Section 2629, it shall not be necessary that he or she obtain a certificate of a physician as required by subdivision (a) of Section 2708 to receive the reduced amount of disability benefits for that day, provided that the claimant submits evidence to the department of receipt of temporary disability benefits under a workers’ compensation law for that day.

(b) This section does not apply to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 3300).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 797, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2709.

If any individual in good faith adheres to the teachings of any bona fide church, sect, denomination or organization and in accordance with its principles depends for healing entirely upon prayer or spiritual means, no medical examination shall be required, but in lieu thereof the director may accept the certificate of a duly authorized and accredited practitioner of that bona fide church, sect, denomination or organization as to the disability of the claimant, or the serious health condition of the family member that warrants the care of the individual, for purposes of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 3300) of Part 2, and the estimated duration of such disability, and no authorized regulation prescribing the manner of proof of illness, injury, or serious health condition shall discriminate against that individual.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 797, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2712.

Whenever an individual is entitled to benefits under this part but there is a dispute whether such benefits are payable from the Disability Fund or from one or another voluntary plan, benefits shall be paid to the individual, pursuant to authorized regulations, from the source against which his claim was first filed, at not less than the Disability Fund rate, pending the determination of the dispute. The appeals board may prescribe by regulation the time, manner, method, and procedure through which such disputes may be determined by administrative law judges and the appeals board. If it is finally determined that the benefits should have been paid from one of said sources other than the one which paid the benefits, reimbursement shall be promptly made from the Disability Fund or the voluntary plan, as the case may be, and the claimant shall be promptly paid the accumulated excess, if any, to which he is entitled. Reimbursement shall also be made to the extent of actual liability for benefits from one to another of the above mentioned sources when it is determined that benefits have been paid in error from one source which should have been paid from another.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 537, Sec. 40.)
-------------------------------------------

2712.5.

(a) If, in a disputed coverage proceeding under Section 2712 a final decision of an administrative law judge or of the appeals board finds that an employer or insurer shall reimburse the Disability Fund and the employer or insurer fails to pay all or any part of the reimbursement within 15 days after the decision of an administrative law judge or of the appeals board becomes final, the director shall assess the unpaid amount against the employer or the insurer. The provisions of Article 8 (commencing with Section 1126) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 with respect to the assessment of contributions shall apply to the recovery of the unpaid amount. The provisions of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1701) of Part 1 with respect to the collection of contributions shall apply to the recovery of unpaid amounts under this section. Amounts so collected shall be deposited in the Disability Fund.

(b) The provisions of Article 9 (commencing with Section 1176) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 shall apply to amounts collected under this section and to amounts reimbursed to the Disability Fund after a final decision by an administrative law judge or the appeals board in a disputed coverage proceeding under Section 2712.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 226, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2713.

In proceedings under this part the claimant, upon a showing of good cause, may request a closed hearing except that the last employer and each base period employer of the claimant shall be entitled to participate in any such hearing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

2714.

All medical records of the department obtained under this part, except to the extent necessary for the proper administration of this part, or as provided elsewhere in law shall be confidential and shall not be published or be open to public inspection in any manner revealing the identity of the claimant or family member, or the nature or cause of his or her disability. Medical records that are disclosed shall be disclosed only pursuant to Section 1095, and shall remain confidential.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 797, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Overpayments [2735. - 2742.]

2735.

Any person who is overpaid any amount as benefits under this part is liable for the amount overpaid unless:

(a) The overpayment was not due to fraud, misrepresentation or wilful nondisclosure on the part of the recipient, and

(b) The overpayment was received without fault on the part of the recipient, and its recovery would be against equity and good conscience.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1153.)
-------------------------------------------

2735.1.

If the director finds that an individual has been overpaid unemployment compensation disability benefits because he or she willfully, for the purpose of obtaining unemployment compensation disability benefits, either made a false statement or representation, with actual knowledge of the falsity thereof, or withheld a material fact, the director shall assess against the individual an amount equal to 30 percent of the overpayment amount. For the purpose of collection, an assessment made pursuant to this section may be treated as an overpayment. Assessments collected under this section shall be deposited in the Unemployment Compensation Disability Fund. No penalty under this section shall be assessed with regard to any false statement or representation made prior to January 1, 1986.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1211, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

2735.5.

No claim of overpayment shall be based upon the disallowance by the Workmen’s Compensation Appeals Board of a claim of lien filed under Section 4903 of the Labor Code, or the allowance of such lien for less than the amount claimed, or upon the approval by the said appeals board of a compromise and release agreement providing for the allowance of such lien in an amount less than the claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1484.)
-------------------------------------------

2736.

The Director of Employment Development shall determine the amount of the overpayment and shall notify the recipient of the basis of the overpayment determination. In the absence of fraud, misrepresentation or willful nondisclosure, notice of the overpayment determination shall be served on the recipient within two years after the beginning of the disability benefit period for which the overpayment was made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 31.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2737.

(a) Within 30 days from the date of mailing or serving of the notice of overpayment determination, the person affected may file an appeal to an administrative law judge. The director shall be an interested party to this appeal. The administrative law judge, after affording reasonable opportunity for a fair hearing, shall, unless the appeal is withdrawn, affirm, reverse, modify, or set aside the findings set forth in the notice of overpayment determination. The party and the director shall be notified of the administrative law judge’s decision, together with his or her reasons therefor, which shall be final unless within 30 days from the date of notification or mailing of the decision a further appeal is initiated to the appeals board pursuant to Section 1336. The 30-day period for an appeal to the administrative law judge or to
 the appeals board may be extended for good cause.

(b) “Good cause,” as used in this section, shall include, but not be limited to, mistake, inadvertence, surprise, or excusable neglect.

(c) This section shall become operative on March 1, 2018.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 276, Sec. 8) by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 250.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative March 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2738.

The Appeals Board shall review an appeal from an overpayment determination as provided in Sections 1336 and 1337 and determine what amount, if any, shall be recovered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 266.)
-------------------------------------------

2739.

The Director of Employment Development, subject to this article, may do any or all of the following in the recovery of overpayments of disability benefits:

(a) File a civil action against the liable person for the recovery of the amount of the overpayment within one year after any of the following, or, in cases where the individual has been overpaid benefits due to fraud, misrepresentation, or nondisclosure as described in Section 2735.1, within three years of any of the following:

(1) The service of the notice of overpayment determination if the person affected does not file an appeal to an administrative law judge.

(2) The mailing of the decision of the administrative law judge if the person affected does not initiate a further appeal to the appeals board.

(3) The date of the decision of the appeals board.

(b) Initiate proceedings for a summary judgment against the liable person. However, this subdivision applies only where the director has found, pursuant to Section 2735, that the overpayment shall not be waived because it was due to fraud, misrepresentation, or willful nondisclosure on the part of the recipient. The director may, not later than three years after the overpayment became final, file with the clerk of the proper
 court in the county in which the claimant resides, a certificate containing all of the following:

(1) The amount due, including the assessment made under Section 2735.1, plus interest from the date that the initial determination of overpayment was made pursuant to Section 2735.

(2) A statement that the director has complied with all of the provisions of this article prior to the filing of the certificate.

(3) A request that judgment be entered against the liable person in the amount set forth in the certificate.

The clerk, immediately upon filing of the certificate, shall enter a judgment for the State of California against the liable person in the amount set forth in the certificate.

For purposes of this subdivision only, an
 overpayment is final and due and payable after one of the following:

(A) The liable person has not filed an appeal pursuant to Section 2737.

(B) The liable person has filed an appeal to an administrative law judge and a decision of the administrative law judge upholding the overpayment has become final.

(C) The liable person has filed an appeal to the appeals board and the decision of the appeals board upholding the overpayment has become final because the liable person has not sought judicial review within the six-month period provided by Section 410.

(c) Reduce or vacate a summary judgment by filing a certificate to that effect with the clerk of the proper court.

(d) Offset the amount of
 the overpayment received by the liable person against any amount of disability benefits to which they may become entitled under this division within six years of the date of service of the notice of overpayment determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 32.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2739.1.

An abstract of judgment obtained pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 2739, or a copy thereof, may be recorded with the county recorder of any county. From the time of recording, the judgment shall constitute a lien against all real or personal property of the liable person in that county owned by the liable person at the time, or which the liable person may afterwards, but before the lien expires, acquire. The lien shall have the force, effect, and priority of a judgment lien and shall continue for 10 years from the time of recording of the abstract of judgment obtained pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 2739, unless sooner released or otherwise discharged.

The lien may, within 10 years from the date of recording of the abstract of judgment or within 10 years from the date of the last extension of the lien in the manner provided, be extended by recording a new abstract in the office of the county recorder of any county. From the date of the recording, the lien shall be extended for 10 years unless sooner released or otherwise discharged.

Execution shall issue upon the judgment upon request of the director in the same manner as execution may issue upon other judgments. Sales shall be held under the execution as prescribed in the Code of Civil Procedure. In all proceedings under this section, the director or his or her authorized agents may act on behalf of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1010, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

2739.2.

(a) If an abstract has been recorded as provided in Section 2739.1 and the lien, including any interest, costs, and penalty has been satisfied in full, the department shall, pursuant to Section 724.050 of the Code of Civil Procedure do all of the following:

(1) File an acknowledgment of satisfaction of judgment with the court.

(2) Serve an acknowledgment of satisfaction of judgment on the claimant. Service shall be made personally or by mail.

(3) Record an acknowledgment of satisfaction of judgment in the office of the county recorder where the abstract of judgment is recorded.

(b) If an acknowledgment of satisfaction of judgment is recorded, the cost of recording shall be an obligation of the claimant and may be collected from the claimant in any manner provided by law for the collection of the benefit overpayment.

(c) If payment is made by check, any action specified in subdivision (a) shall not be required until the check has been paid by the financial institution upon which it was drawn.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1010, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

2739.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the Franchise Tax Board shall aid the director in the recovery of overpayments of disability benefits through the exchange of information.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 226, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2740.

No person shall be liable for the amount of benefits received where the benefits were paid pursuant to an administrative law judge’s decision which affirmed an initial determination or in accordance with a final decision of the appeals board, regardless of any further appeal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 537, Sec. 44.)
-------------------------------------------

2741.

Any claim of lien filed with the Workmen’s Compensation Appeals Board under the provisions of Section 4903 of the Labor Code shall be fully discharged and satisfied by payment of the amount of such lien allowed by the said appeals board under the provisions of Section 4904 of said code or the amount specified in any compromise and release agreement filed and approved by the said appeals board pursuant to Sections 5000 through 5004 of said code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1484.)
-------------------------------------------

2742.

The director shall enforce collection of any judgment obtained by him or her under subdivision (a) or subdivision (b), or both, of Section 2739. Amounts collected under this section shall be deposited in the fund from which the overpayment was made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1010, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Rights of Trainees [2765. - 2772.]

2765.

Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of this part the benefit rights of trainees shall be determined in accordance with the provisions of this article for the periods and with respect to the matters specified in this article. Except as otherwise provided in this article all other provisions of this part shall continue to be applicable in connection with such benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1165.)
-------------------------------------------

2766.

“Military service” as used in this article means active service in the land or naval forces of the United States, but the service of an individual in any reserve component of the land or naval forces of the United States who is ordered to active duty in any such force for a period of 30 days or less shall not be deemed active service in that force during that period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1165.)
-------------------------------------------

2767.

“Trainee” as used in this article means an individual who entered military service after April 1, 1940, and who continued such service for not less than 90 consecutive days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1692.)
-------------------------------------------

2768.

When any trainee has an unexpired benefit year for disability benefits at the time of induction into the armed forces, the unexpended balance of disability benefits remaining to his account shall be reestablished beginning with the first day of the first week succeeding the date of his termination of service. The balance shall be paid at a weekly rate in accordance with Section 2655. In the event the records relating to the unexpended balance have been destroyed under proper approval, the trainee may establish the unexpended balance by affidavit as provided by authorized regulation. Whenever this balance is exhausted the trainee may file a claim and his disability base period shall be determined in accordance with Sections 2770 and 2610 or Section 2611. All reestablished balances shall lapse 65 weeks after termination of military service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

2769.

The filing of a valid claim for disability benefits by a trainee shall establish a disability benefit period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1165.)
-------------------------------------------

2770.

Except when subdivision (b) of Section 2611 is applicable, in determining the benefit rights of trainees the disability base period shall exclude those quarters during which the trainee was in military service 60 days or more. For all quarters so excluded there shall be substituted an equal number of quarters immediately preceding the trainee’s entry into military service. In the event the base period so determined includes wages in calendar quarters for which the records have been destroyed under proper approval, the claimant may establish the amount of the wages by affidavit in accordance with authorized regulation. The quarter of entry into military service shall be counted as a completed quarter if the director finds that the inclusion thereof would be more equitable to the trainee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1211, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

2771.

No disqualification shall be applied to any trainee after the termination of his military service, by reason of any act or course of action on his part prior to the date of his entry into such service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1165.)
-------------------------------------------

2772.

Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of this part, any trainee who was a resident of this state at the time of his entrance into the military service, who is a resident of this state at the time he applies for disability compensation benefits under this section, and who has been disabled in the military service and is eligible to receive disability compensation from the federal government for such disability, shall be eligible, upon his discharge from the military service, to receive disability compensation benefits under Section 2655 from the time he is determined by the federal government to be eligible for disability compensation payments from the federal government until such time as he begins to receive his disability compensation payments from the federal government.

Such trainee’s weekly benefit amount shall be the maximum amount specified in Section 2655 or the amount of the disability compensation which he is eligible to receive from the federal government, whichever is smaller.

Each trainee receiving any benefits pursuant to this section shall repay to the state the amount received as benefits hereunder. Each trainee, as a condition of receiving benefit hereunder, shall assign to the state the disability compensation which he is eligible to receive from the federal government to the extent that he receives benefits from the state pursuant to this section and shall enter into a contract with the director, in a form prescribed by the director, under which the trainee will be obligated to repay the state over a period of not more than one year following the date he first receives disability compensation from the federal government for his disability. Repayments made by such trainees shall be deposited by the director in the General Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1449.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Rights of Industrially Disabled Persons [2775. - 2778.]

2775.

Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of this part, the benefit rights of industrially disabled persons shall be determined in accordance with the provisions of this article for the period and with respect to the matters specified in this article. Except as otherwise provided in this article, all of the provisions of this part shall continue to be applicable in connection with such benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1027.)
-------------------------------------------

2776.

As used in this article:

(a) “Industrially disabled person” means an individual who has received or is entitled to receive benefits under Division 4 (commencing with Section 3201) of the Labor Code, and who is unable to perform his regular or customary work for 60 consecutive days or more, but not to exceed two calendar years from the date of commencement of his industrial disability.

(b) “Industrial disability” means a disability compensable under Division 4 (commencing with Section 3201) of the Labor Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1027.)
-------------------------------------------

2777.

Except as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 2611, in determining the benefit rights of any industrially disabled person the disability base period shall exclude those quarters during which such person was industrially disabled for 60 days or more. For all quarters so excluded there shall be substituted an equal number of quarters immediately preceding the commencement of his or her industrial disability. In the event the base period so determined includes wages in calendar quarters for which the records have been destroyed under proper approval, a claimant may establish the amount of wages by affidavit in accordance with authorized regulations. The quarter of commencement of an industrial disability shall be counted as a completed quarter if the director finds that the inclusion thereof would be more equitable to the industrially disabled person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1211, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

2778.

No disqualification shall be applied to any industrially disabled person after the termination of his industrial disability, by reason of any act or course of action on his part prior to the date on which his industrial disability commenced.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1027.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.4. Nonindustrial Disability Insurance for State Employees [2781. - 2783.]

2781.

Except as provided in this chapter and Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 19878) of Part 2.6 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, a state employee shall be eligible for nonindustrial disability benefits on the same terms and conditions as are specified by this part. Except as inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter and Chapter 2.6 (commencing with Section 19878) of Part 2.6 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the provisions of this division and authorized regulations shall apply to any matter arising pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 152, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

2782.

(a) The provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 2901), Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 3001), and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 3251) of Part 2 do not apply to this chapter.

(b) The provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 2652), Article 6 (commencing with Section 2765) and Article 7 (commencing with Section 2775) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 do not apply to this chapter.

(c) Sections 2609, 2610, 2611, 2625, 2712, and 2712.5 do not apply to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1025, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

2783.

(a) Nonindustrial disability benefits are payable by the Controller upon authorization by the Employment Development Department to individuals who are eligible to receive such benefit payments under this chapter.

(b) In lieu of the contributions required of employees, the State of California shall pay into the Disability Fund in the State Treasury at the times and in the manner provided in subdivision (c), an amount equal to the additional cost to the Disability Fund for added administrative work arising out of nonindustrial disability insurance for state employees.

(c) In making the payments prescribed by subdivision (b), there shall be paid or credited to the Disability Fund, either in advance or by way of reimbursement, as may be determined by the director, such sums as he estimates the Disability Fund will be entitled to receive from the State of California under this section for each fiscal year, reduced or increased by any sum by which he finds that his estimates for any prior fiscal year were greater or less than the amounts which should have been paid to the fund. Such estimates may be made upon the basis of statistical sampling, or other method as may be determined by the director. 

Upon making such determination, the director shall certify to the Controller the amount determined with respect to the State of California. The Controller shall pay to the Disability Fund the contributions due from the State of California.

(d) The director may require from each state agency such employment, wage, financial, statistical, or other information and reports, properly verified, as may be deemed necessary by the director to carry out his duties under this chapter, which shall be filed with the director at the time and in the manner prescribed by him.

(e) The director may tabulate and publish information obtained pursuant to this chapter in statistical form and may divulge the name of the employing unit.

(f) Each state agency shall keep such work records as may be prescribed by the director for the proper administration of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 341.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Contributions [2901. - 2903.]

2901.

Each individual performing services for an employer in employment shall contribute to the Disability Fund the contributions required of such individual by Sections 984 and 985.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2154.)
-------------------------------------------

2902.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, any individual who adheres to the faith or teaching of any bona fide religious sect, denomination, or organization, and in accordance with its creed, tenets, or principles, depends for healing upon prayer in the practice of religion, upon filing with the department and with each of his employers a statement declaring such adherence and dependence and disclaiming any benefits under this part, shall be exempt from contributions under this division in respect to any wages paid to him by any such employer in the calendar quarter in which such statement is filed, in all subsequent calendar quarters while such statement is in effect, and, if the individual so elects, in any prior calendar quarter for which wages are reported to the department on or after the date such statement is filed. Such individual shall be ineligible to receive benefits under this part based upon such wages.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

2903.

The time, procedure, manner of payment and collection of contributions under this part shall be in accordance with the provisions of Part 1 of this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Financial Provisions [3001. - 3075.]



  ARTICLE 1. Disability Fund [3001. - 3015.]

3001.

(a) The Unemployment Compensation Disability Fund is continued in existence as a special fund in the State Treasury, separate and apart from all other public money or funds of this state. The moneys and assets of this fund shall be held in trust by the State Treasurer and administered under the direction of the director exclusively, for the purpose of this part.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the Controller may use the moneys in the Unemployment Compensation Disability Fund for loans to the General Fund as provided in Sections 16310 and 16381 of the Government Code. However, interest shall be paid on all moneys loaned to the General Fund from the Unemployment Compensation Disability Fund. Interest payable shall be computed at a rate determined by the Pooled Money Investment Board to be the current earning rate of the fund from which loaned. This subdivision does not authorize any transfer that will interfere with the carrying out of the object for which the Unemployment Compensation Disability Fund was created.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 9, Sec. 22.   Effective February 20, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

3002.

The State Treasurer is the treasurer of the Disability Fund and shall have the custody of all money belonging to the Disability Fund and not otherwise held, deposited or invested under this part. The official bond of the State Treasurer shall cover the faithful performance of his or her duties as treasurer of the Disability Fund. The State Treasurer shall invest or otherwise deal with the Disability Fund under the supervision of the director. The State Treasurer may, pursuant to Section 16470 of the Government Code, file with the Pooled Money Investment Board a notice of election that investment of surplus money in the Disability Fund shall come under the provisions of the Surplus Money Investment Fund, and may revoke such election pursuant to Section 16470 of the Government Code. As of the effective date of any election with respect to the Disability Fund filed pursuant to Section 16470 of the Government Code, the State Treasurer shall transfer the surplus money in the Disability Fund to the Surplus Money Investment Fund, and may transfer all or any portion of the investments held by the Disability Fund at the date of such election, from the Disability Fund to the Surplus Money Investment Fund. As of the effective date of the revocation of any such election, the State Treasurer shall transfer from the Surplus Money Investment Fund to the Disability Fund the surplus money and earnings attributable to the Disability Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1025, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

3003.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), all surplus money in the Disability Fund may be invested solely in securities set forth in subdivision (b) of this section, and all interest or earnings therefrom shall be deposited in the Disability Fund.

(b) Eligible securities for the investment of surplus money shall be:

(1) Bonds or interest-bearing notes or obligations of the United States, or those for which the faith and credit of the United States are pledged for the payment of principal and interest.

(2) Bonds of this state, or those for which the faith and credit of this state are pledged for the payment of principal and interest.

(3) Bonds of any county, city, metropolitan water district, municipal utility district, or school district of this state.

(4) Bonds, consolidated bonds, collateral trust debentures, consolidated debentures, or other obligations issued by federal land banks or federal intermediate credit banks established under the Federal Farm Loan Act.

(5) Debentures and consolidated debentures issued by the Central Bank for Cooperatives and banks for cooperatives established under the Farm Credit Act of 1933.

(6) Bonds or debentures of the Federal Home Loan Bank Board established under the Federal Home Loan Bank Act.

(7) Bonds of any federal home loan bank established under the Federal Home Loan Bank Act.

(8) Stock, bonds, debentures and other obligations of the Federal National Mortgage Association established under the National Housing Act.

(9) Bonds, notes, and other obligations issued by the Tennessee Valley Authority under the Tennessee Valley Authority Act.

(c) This section shall not apply during the period of any election under Section 16470 of the Government Code for investment of surplus money in the Disability Fund under the provisions of the Surplus Money Investment Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1025, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

3004.

The Disability Fund consists of all contributions required of individuals under Section 984 with respect to wages paid by employers for employment; all money received for the purpose of disability benefits from the United States of America or any agency thereof, or from any other source; and any property or securities acquired through the use of money belonging to the Disability Fund and all earnings of such money or securities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1729.)
-------------------------------------------

3005.

All money received from the Federal Government for disability benefit purposes or for the administration of this part shall be deposited in the Disability Fund in accordance with the terms of the federal grant. Unless the Federal Government approves, no money made available to this State under Title 3 of the Social Security Act shall be used for disability benefits or for the administration of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 309.)
-------------------------------------------

3006.

There shall be no further transfer of money from the Unemployment Trust Fund to the Disability Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 397.)
-------------------------------------------

3008.

All money collected under Section 984 shall be deposited in the Disability Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1025, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

3009.

Refunds, credits, or judgments, and interest thereon, payable for contributions erroneously collected under Sections 984 and 985 may be paid from the Disability Fund on warrants issued by the Controller under the direction of the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1025, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

3010.

Any amounts determined by the director or his authorized representatives to be payable to employing units or workers as refunds of amounts deposited in the various accounts of the Disability Fund which are unclaimed at the end of three years from such determination, shall be included in the revenue to the account in the Disability Fund in which they were deposited. The employing unit or person entitled to such payment shall not thereafter maintain any claim, action or proceeding with respect to such amounts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

3011.

Whenever any warrant is drawn on an account in the Disability Fund by the Controller, and the same remains unclaimed after one year, the amount thereof shall revert to that account in the Disability Fund from which the amount was payable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 298.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

3012.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all money in the Disability Fund is continuously appropriated for the purpose of providing disability benefits pursuant to this part, including the payment of refunds, credits, or judgments, and interest thereon, the payment of disability benefits to all eligible persons not covered exclusively by an approved voluntary plan, and the payment of the expenses of administration of this part and Section 17061 of the Revenue and Taxation Code by the department and the Franchise Tax Board. “Eligible persons” as used in this section, means those individuals who are covered by the Disability Fund at the time his or her disability benefit period commences, or whose employment has terminated or who is in noncovered employment at the time his or her disability benefit period commences, and who is otherwise eligible for benefits under this part.
